Connecticut, session 2026, SB00330.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 17b-342 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(i) (1) The Commissioner of Social Services shall, within available
appropriations, administer a state-funded portion of the Connecticut
home-care program for the elderly for persons (A) who are sixty-five
years of age and older and are not eligible for Medicaid; (B) who are
inappropriately institutionalized or at risk of inappropriate
institutionalization; (C) whose income is less than or equal to the
amount allowed for a person who would be eligible for medical
assistance if residing in a nursing facility; and (D) whose assets, if single,
do not exceed one hundred fifty per cent of the federal minimum
community spouse protected amount pursuant to 42 USC 1396r-5(f)(2)
or, if married, the couple's assets do not exceed two hundred per cent of
said community spouse protected amount. For program applications
LCO No. 1893 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 330
received by the Department of Social Services for the fiscal years ending
June 30, 2016, and June 30, 2017, only persons who require the level of
care provided in a nursing home shall be eligible for the state-funded
portion of the program, except for persons residing in affordable
housing under the assisted living demonstration project established
pursuant to section 17b-347e who are otherwise eligible in accordance
with this section.
(2) Except for persons residing in affordable housing under the
assisted living demonstration project established pursuant to section
17b-347e, as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, any person
whose income is at or below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty
level and who is ineligible for Medicaid shall contribute three per cent
of the cost of his or her care. Any person whose income exceeds two
hundred per cent of the federal poverty level shall contribute three per
cent of the cost of his or her care in addition to the amount of applied
income determined in accordance with the methodology established by
the Department of Social Services for recipients of medical assistance.
Any person who does not contribute to the cost of care in accordance
with this subdivision shall be ineligible to receive services under this
subsection. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 17b-60 and 17b-
61, the department shall not be required to provide an administrative
hearing to a person found ineligible for services under this subsection
because of a failure to contribute to the cost of care.
(3) Any person who resides in affordable housing under the assisted
living demonstration project established pursuant to section 17b-347e,
and whose income is at or below two hundred per cent of the federal
poverty level, shall not be required to contribute to the cost of care. Any
person who resides in affordable housing under the assisted living
demonstration project established pursuant to section 17b-347e, and
whose income exceeds two hundred per cent of the federal poverty
level, shall contribute to the applied income amount determined in
accordance with the methodology established by the Department of
Social Services for recipients of medical assistance. Any person whose
LCO No. 1893 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 330
income exceeds two hundred per cent of the federal poverty level and
who does not contribute to the cost of care in accordance with this
subdivision shall be ineligible to receive services under this subsection.
Notwithstanding any provision of sections 17b-60 and 17b-61, the
department shall not be required to provide an administrative hearing
to a person found ineligible for services under this subsection because
of a failure to contribute to the cost of care.
(4) The annualized cost of services provided to an individual under
the state-funded portion of the program shall not exceed fifty per cent
of the weighted average cost of care in nursing homes in the state, except
an individual who received services costing in excess of such amount
under the Department of Social Services in the fiscal year ending June
30, 1992, may continue to receive such services, provided the annualized
cost of such services does not exceed eighty per cent of the weighted
average cost of such nursing home care. The commissioner may allow
the cost of services provided to an individual to exceed the maximum
cost established pursuant to this subdivision in a case of extreme
hardship, as determined by the commissioner, provided in no case shall
such cost exceed that of the weighted cost of such nursing home care.
(5) A person who provides personal care assistance to an individual
enrolled in the state-funded portion of the program, including a spouse
of such individual, may be compensated for such assistance. The
Commissioner of Social Services shall prescribe training and
documentation requirements for such person to receive compensation
under the program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-342(i)
LCO No. 1893 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 330